en: Inorganic salts
it: Sali inorganici
ja: 無機塩

en: diphosphates and sodium carbonates
bg: дифосфати и натриеви карбонати
ca: difosfats i carbonats de sodi
cs: difosforečnany a uhličitany sodné
da: diphosphater og natriumkarbonater, diphosphater og natriumcarbonater
de: Diphosphate und Natriumcarbonate, E 450 und E 500, E450 und E500
el: διφωσφορικά άλατα και ανθρακικά νάτρια
es: difosfatos y carbonatos de sodio
et: difosfaadid ja naatriumkarbonaadid
fi: difosfaatit ja natriumkarbonaatit
fr: diphosphate et carbonate de calcium, diphosphates et carbonates de sodium, e450 et e500
hr: difosfati i natrijevi karbonati
hu: difoszfátok és nátrium-karbonátok
it: difosfati e carbonati di sodio, E 450 ed E 500, E450 ed E500
lt: difosfatai ir natrio karbonatai
lv: difosfāti un nātrija karbonāti
mt: difosfati u karbonati tas-sodju
nl: difosfaten en natriumcarbonaten
pl: difosforany i węglany sodu
pt: difosfatos e carbonatos de sódio
ro: difosfați și carbonați de sodiu
ru: дифосфаты и карбонаты натрия
sk: difosforečnany a uhličitany sodné
sl: difosfati in natrijevi karbonati
sv: difosfater och natriumkarbonater

ca: carbonat àcid de sodi i difosfat de disodi
fr: diphosphate disodique et carbonate acide de sodium
ru: сода, сода пищевая, гидрокарбонат натрия, разрыхлитель гидрокарбонат натрия

en: di- and triphosphates
bg: ди- и трифосфати
ca: di- i trifosfats
cs: di- a trifosforečnany
da: di- och triphosphater
de: Di- und Triphosphate, Stabilisator Di- und Triphosphate
el: δι- και τριφωσφορικά άλατα
es: di- y trifosfatos
et: di- ja trifosfaadid
fi: di- ja trifosfaatit
fr: diphosphates et triphosphates, triphosphates et diphosphates, di- et triphosphate
hr: di- i trifosfati
lt: di- ir trifosfatai
lv: di- un trifosfāti
mt: di- u trifosfati
nl: difosfaten en trifosfaten
pl: di- i trifosforany
pt: di- e trifosfatos
ro: di- și trifosfați
ru: ди- и трифосфаты
sk: di- a trifosforečnany
sl: di- in trifosfati
sv: di- och trifosfater

en: ammonium and sodium carbonates
bg: амониеви и натриеви карбонати
ca: carbonats d'amoni i de sodi
cs: uhličitany amonné a sodné
da: ammonium- og natriumkarbonat, ammonium- og natriumcarbonat
de: Ammonium und Natriumcarbonat
el: ανθρακικά άλατα αμμωνίου και νατρίου
es: carbonatos de amonio y de sodio
et: ammoonium- ja naatriumkarbonaadid
fi: ammonium- ja natriumkarbonaatit
fr: carbonates d'ammonium et de sodium
hr: amonijevi i natrijevi karbonati
hu: ammónium- és nátrium-karbonátok
it: carbonati di ammonio e di sodio
lt: amonio ir natrio karbonatai, kildinimo medžiaga amonio karbonatas
lv: amonija un nātrija karbonāti
mt: karbonati tal-ammonju u tas-sodju
nl: ammonium- en natriumcarbonaten, ammonium carbonaten en natrium
pl: węglany amonu i sodu
pt: carbonatos de amônio e de sódio, carbonatos de amónio e de sódio
ro: carbonați de amoniu și de sodiu
ru: карбонаты аммония и натрия
sk: uhličitany amónne a sodné
sl: amonijevi in natrijevi karbonati
sv: ammonium- och natriumkarbonater